Wyoming, session 2025, HB0270.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-4-719(d)(v) is amended to read:

9-4-719. Investment earnings; spending policy
amounts; permanent funds.

(d) The annual spending policy for the permanent
Wyoming mineral trust fund is for each fiscal year (FY):

HB0270

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0494
(v) An amount equal to five percent (5%) four
and one-half percent (4.5%) of the previous five (5) year
average market value of the trust fund, calculated from the
first day of the fiscal year.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0270